Illinois, session 104th, HB5178.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Supervised Parenting Safety and Fairness Act. 6    Section 5. Findings and purpose. 7    (a) The General Assembly makes the following findings: 8        (1) supervised parenting time is a critical safety 9    measure when a parent poses a risk to a child or the other 10    parent; 11        (2) courts sometimes order supervision without 12    verifying the actual availability of qualified supervisors 13    resulting in unsafe defaults to unsupervised parenting 14    time; 15        (3) courts often require a safe or protective parent 16    to pay for supervision or programs necessitated solely by 17    the conduct of the other parent; and 18        (4) process and evidentiary rules should protect 19    children and protective parents from being re-victimized 20    by litigation tactics.21    (b) The purpose of this Act is to ensure that supervision 22is not bypassed because of a lack of available supervisors to 23ensure that determinations of safety and conflict are made   HB5178- 2 -LRB104 20289 JRC 33740 b1using trauma-informed and evidence-based standards and to 2protect protective parents and children from misclassification 3and procedural misuse. 4    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act: 5    "Abuse" for the purposes of this Act, means conduct 6including, but not limited to, domestic violence, sexual 7violence, limitation of freedom, coercive control, imposed 8isolation, psychological or emotional abuse, stalking or 9harassment, or persistent and vexatious misuse of court or 10legal procedure to continue abuse after separation.11    "Qualified supervisor" means a court-approved individual 12or program meeting established standards for supervised 13parenting time. 14    "Supervised parenting time" means parenting time conducted 15in the presence of a qualified supervisor. 16    "Court-appointed officers" means guardians ad litem, 17parenting coordinators, court evaluators, and other persons 18appointed by the court to assess parenting, safety, or risk 19and to advocate for the best interests of the child. 20    Section 15. Verification of supervisor availability. 21    (a) Before ordering supervised parenting time, the court 22must determine whether qualified supervisors are reasonably 23available within the child's geographic area and document the 24inquiry.   HB5178- 3 -LRB104 20289 JRC 33740 b1    (b) If supervision is warranted, the court may not order 2or permit unsupervised parenting time solely because no 3qualified supervisor is available. 4    (c) If no qualified supervisor is available, the court 5must maintain the restriction on unsupervised parenting time 6and order one or more statutorily authorized alternatives, 7including temporary suspension of in-person parenting time, 8virtual contact, therapeutic supervised contact, or other 9protective measures necessary to ensure safety. 10    Section 20. Necessity of supervision. 11    (a) There is a rebuttable presumption of supervised 12parenting time: 13        (1) in any case in which that parent has committed 14    abuse against the child or the other parent based on a 15    preponderance of the evidence; 16        (2) if the other parent has an active order of 17    protection against the parent that has been upheld or 18    extended after a hearing. 19    (b) Nothing in this Section may be interpreted to prohibit 20a court from deeming supervision to be necessary in other 21circumstances. 22    (c) Evidence of abuse may not be given weight if it appears 23more probable than not to be manufactured or the product of 24coaching or fabricated, unless it can be independently 25corroborated.